Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2845
Medical review panel; members; compensation; expert witness fee.

Each member of the medical review panel shall be paid fifty dollars per day for all work performed as a member of the panel, exclusive of time and services involved if called as a witness to testify in court and reasonable expenses incurred. Fees of the panel, including expenses, shall be paid equally by each side. If a panel member is called as an expert witness at the trial, the panel member shall be paid the customary expert witness fee.

Laws 1976, LB 434, § 45;

Laws 2002, LB 1139, § 23.